Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116L.36] GRANTEE EVALUATIONS. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 15, 2026, and each year thereafter, the commissioner must submit a report on organizations that received grants from the department in the preceding fiscal year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce development. new text end new text begin (b) The report required under paragraph (a) must include the following information from each grant recipient: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of the purpose of the grant; new text end new text begin (2) the amount of the grant awarded to the grantee; new text end new text begin (3) the amount of previous grants issued by the department to the grantee; new text end new text begin (4) the amount of other state and federal grants awarded to the grantee in the most recent fiscal year; new text end new text begin (5) the number of Minnesotans served by the organization and, if applicable, completing the organization's job training program; new text end new text begin (6) the number of Minnesotans successfully placed in a living wage job by the organization; new text end new text begin (7) the placement effectiveness, calculated by dividing the number of Minnesotans calculated in clause (6) by the number in clause (5); new text end new text begin (8) the cost effectiveness, calculated by dividing the sum of clauses (2) and (4) by the number of Minnesotans calculated in clause (6); and new text end new text begin (9) the organization's charitable giving ratio. new text end new text begin (c) If a grantee uses grant money to provide services to persons who reside outside of Minnesota, the grantee must list the states where non-Minnesotan participants reside and an explanation of why grant money was used to provide services to non-Minnesota residents. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner is not required to provide information in response to paragraph (b), clauses (5) to (8), for a grantee that does not offer programming that requires completion or that cannot be measured by objective standards. The commissioner is not required to report on information required in paragraph (a) that was not collected by the commissioner prior to enactment of this section. new text end